District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-327

Employment of personnel; compensation; delegation of powers.

Repealed.

Sept. 7, 1957, 71 Stat. 621, Pub. L. 85-300, § 8
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3205(bb), 25 DCR 5740
Aug. 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-152, § 21(a)(4), 41 DCR 4636

History

Effective date provisions, see § 1-636.02.

Cross References

1981 Ed., § 2-327.
1973 Ed., § 2-1726.

Prior Codifications

See note to § 3-321.

Transfer of Functions

Editor's Notes

Effect of dissolution of Sports Commission: See note to § 3-321.

Construction of Law 10-152: See note to § 3-321.